North Carolina statutes. Chapter 4. Common Law.
§ 4-1.
Common law declared to be in force.

All such parts of the common law as were heretofore in force and use within this State, or so much of the common law as is not destructive of, or repugnant to, or inconsistent with, the freedom and independence of this State and the form of government therein established, and which has not been otherwise provided for in whole or in part, not abrogated, repealed, or become obsolete, are hereby declared to be in full force within this State.

History.

1715, c. 5, ss. 2, 3, P.R; 1778, c. 133, P.R; R.C., c. 22; Code, s. 641; Rev., s. 932; C.S., s. 970.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the role of the judiciary in the abrogation of the municipal tort immunity rule, see 5 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 383 (1969).

For article, “The Rule in Wild’s Case in North Carolina,” see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 751 (1977).

For article, “The Common Law Powers of the Attorney General of North Carolina,” see 9 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1977).

For article discussing the influence, past and future, of civil law on common law jurisdictions, see 1990 Duke L.J. 1207.

For note, “Its Days were Numbered: The Year and a Day Rule Falls in North Carolina — State v. Vance,” see 14 Campbell L. Rev. 235 (1992).

For note, “Searching for Limits on a Municipality’s Retention of Governmental Immunity,” see 76 N.C.L. Rev. 269 (1997).

For note, “Not-So-Secrets? The State of the Attorney-Client Privilege in North Carolina in the Wake of In re Investigation of Death of Eric Miller and Crawford v. Washington,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1591 (2005).

For note, “A New Route to Medical Malpractice in North Carolina?,” see 31 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 198 (2009).